src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON numerals

! number words are still not treated here.

ARABIC          ; ! for the arabic numerals !
ROMAN           ; ! for the roman numerals  !
NUM-PREFIXES    ; ! for §34 etc.            !
ISOLATED-NUMEXP ; ! for ½ etc.                      !
COORDINATES_1	; ! for 65˚36′8,30″ etc.

LEXICON ARABIC   !!= * **@CODE@** arabic numerals
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > ARABICS      ;
                           ARABICYEAR ;

LEXICON ARABICS
 ARABICLOOP      ;
 ARABICLOOPORD   ;
 ARABICLOOPCOLL  ;
 ARABICLOOPphone ;

LEXICON ARABICYEAR
< [1|2] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numyear ;

LEXICON numyear
 yeartag ;
 %/:%/ moreyear ;
 %-:%- moreyear ;

LEXICON moreyear 
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > yeartagpl ;

LEXICON yeartag
+Num+Sem/Year:  yearcase ;

LEXICON yeartagpl
 +Num+Sem/Year+Sg+Nom:       #      ;


LEXICON yearcase
 +Sg+Nom:       #      ;
 +Cmp/SplitR:%–    ENDLEX ;

LEXICON ARABICLOOPphone   !!= * **@CODE@** +358(0)16671254
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > ARABICLOOPphone ;
  (:(             ARABICLOOPphone ;
  ):)             ARABICLOOPphone ;
 %—:%—            ARABICLOOPphone ; 
!2019-08-01                           ARABICCASEphone ;

!LEXICON ARABICCASEphone   !!= * __@CODE@__  
! +Num+Arab+Sg+Nom: # ;
! +Num+Arab+Sg+Acc: # ;
! +Num+Arab+Sg+Gen: # ;

LEXICON ARABICLOOP   !!= * **@CODE@**
         :         ARABIC ;
       %-:%-       ARABIC ; ! 1-2 multipart numbers
       %–:%–       ARABIC ; ! 1–2 multipart numbers
       %—:%—       ARABIC ; ! 1—2 multipart numbers
     %.%-:%.%-     ARABIC ; ! 1.-2 multipart numbers ! !
     %.%–:%.%–     ARABIC ; ! 1.–2 multipart numbers ! !
     %.%—:%.%—     ARABIC ; ! 1.—2 multipart numbers ! !
     %-% :%-%      ARABIC ; ! 1- 2 multipart numbers
     %–% :%–%      ARABIC ; ! 1– 2 multipart numbers
     %—% :%—%      ARABIC ; ! 1— 2 multipart numbers
     % %-:% %-     ARABIC ; ! 1 -2 multipart numbers
     % %–:% %–     ARABIC ; ! 1 –2 multipart numbers
     % %—:% %—     ARABIC ; ! 1 —2 multipart numbers
   % %-% :% %-%    ARABIC ; ! 1 - 2 multipart numbers
   % %–% :% %–%    ARABIC ; ! 1 – 2 multipart numbers
   % %—% :% %—%    ARABIC ; ! 1 — 2 multipart numbers
 % %-%-% :% %-%-%  ARABIC ; ! 1 -- 2 multipart numbers
 % %–%–% :% %–%–%  ARABIC ; ! 1 –– 2 multipart numbers
 % %—%—% :% %—%—%  ARABIC ; ! 1 —— 2 multipart numbers
       %.:%.       ARABIC ;
       %::%:       ARABIC ;
       %,:%,       ARABIC ;
       % :%        ARABIC ; ! Allowing for "23 500".
         :         ARABIC ; ! Allowing for "23 500" w/nbsp (init char = alt-space)
       %/:%/       ARABIC ; ! 24/12
     %/% :%/%      ARABIC ; ! 24/ 12
     % %/:% %/     ARABIC ; ! 24 /12

!+Num:         RNum   ; ! Num Cmp Noun, with hyphen

         ,%-+Num:,%-    ARABICCASES     ; ! 10,-
,%-+Num+Err/Orth:.%-    ARABICCASES     ; ! 10.- It is wrong, but written.
   % %-+Err/Orth:% %-   ARABICDELIMITER ; ! 1 - multipart numbers - "1 -:s"?
 % %-%-+Err/Orth:% %-%- ARABICDELIMITER ; ! 1 -- multipart numbers
              %%:%%     ARABICDELIMITER ; ! 50%. It is wrong, but 75 % of us write "75%".
            % %%:% %%   ARABICDELIMITER ; ! the correct ones as well... 50 % etc.
                                 ARABICDELIMITER ; ! list of number-case delimiters

LEXICON ARABICLOOPORD   !!= * **@CODE@** ordinals
 +A+Ord:%. ABS_ ;
 +A+Ord: ARABICDELIMITERORD ;
 < [a|b|c|d|e|f|f %  f] > ACASETAG ;

LEXICON ACASETAG   !!= * **@CODE@**  is for 1e+Num+Sg+Num:1e
+Num: ARABICCASES ;

LEXICON ARABICLOOPCOLL   !!= * **@CODE@** collectives
+Num+Coll:%-нан ABS_ ;
! +N+Coll: ARABICDELIMITERCOLL ;


LEXICON ARABICDELIMITER   !!= * **@CODE@**  blank + 3 delim, what does the lg counc prefer?
 +Num:            ARABICCASE0      ; ! This is the 1984 case, ie NGA
 +Num:%-          ARABICCASE       ; ! This is the 1984:s case.
! +Num:            ARAB_DER ; ! 6-jáhkasaš, 
! +Num: Rhyph ; ! 3-


LEXICON ARABICDELIMITERORD   !!= * **@CODE@** ordinals
!             ARABICCASE0   ; ! This is the 1984 case, ie NGA
          :%-ӧд ARABICCASEORD ; ! This is the 1984:s case.


LEXICON ARABICCASES   !!= * **@CODE@**  to distinguish between 0 and oblique
ARABICCASE0 ;
:%- ARABICCASE ;

LEXICON ARABICCASE0   !!= * **@CODE@**
 +Arab+Sg+Nom:      #      ;
 +Arab+Cmp/SplitR:%–    ENDLEX ;


LEXICON ARABICCASE
 +Arab+Der/a+Sg+Nom:%>а        # ;
 +Arab+Sg+Acc1:%>ӧс        # ;
 +Arab+Sg+Dat:%>лы        # ;
 +Arab+Sg+Egr:%>сянь        # ;
 +Arab+Sg+Ela:%>ысь        # ; ! Perhaps +Iter
 +Arab+Sg+Ill:%>ӧ        # ;
 +Arab+Sg+Ter:%>ӧдз        # ;
 +Arab+Sg+Ter+PxSg3:%>ӧдзыс        # ;

LEXICON ARABICCASEORD
 +Arab+Sg+Gen:%>лӧн    K ;
 +Arab+Sg+Ill:%>ӧ        # ;
 +Arab+Sg+Nom:    K ;
 +Arab+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:%>ыс    K ;


! The Roman numerals !
! ------------------ !

LEXICON ROMAN						!^C^
 : ROM-THOUSAND ;						!
 : ROM-HUNDRED ;						!
 : ROM-TEN ;							!
 : ROM-ONE ;							!

LEXICON ROM-THOUSAND              	!^C^
 M:M ROM-THOUSAND-TAG;				!
 MM:MM ROM-THOUSAND-TAG;				!
 MMM:MMM ROM-THOUSAND-TAG;				!
 MMMM:MMMM ROM-THOUSAND-TAG;			!
 MMMMM:MMMMM ROM-THOUSAND-TAG;			!

LEXICON ROM-THOUSAND-TAG			!^C^
 : ROMNUMTAG ;						!
 : ROM-HUNDRED ;						!
 : ROM-SPLIT	;						!

LEXICON ROM-HUNDRED					!^C^
 C:C ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;				!
 CC:CC ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;				!
 CCC:CCC ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;				!
 CD:CD ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;				!
 D:D ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;				!
 DC:DC ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;				!
 DCC:DCC ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;				!
 DCCC:DCCC ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;				!
 CM:CM ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;				!

LEXICON ROM-HUNDRED-TAG				!^C^
 : ROMNUMTAG ;						!
 : ROM-TEN ;							!
 : ROM-SPLIT ;						!

LEXICON ROM-TEN						!^C^
 X:X ROM-TEN-TAG;					!
 XX:XX ROM-TEN-TAG;					!
 XXX:XXX ROM-TEN-TAG;					!
 XL:XL ROM-TEN-TAG;					!
 L:L ROM-TEN-TAG;					!
 LX:LX ROM-TEN-TAG;					!
 LXX:LXX ROM-TEN-TAG;					!
 LXXX:LXXX ROM-TEN-TAG;					!
 XC:XC ROM-TEN-TAG;					!

LEXICON ROM-TEN-TAG					!^C^
 : ROMNUMTAG ;						!
 : ROM-ONE ;							!
 : ROM-SPLIT ;						!

LEXICON ROM-ONE						!^C^
 I:I ROM-ONE-TAG;					!
 II:II ROM-ONE-TAG;					!
 III:III ROM-ONE-TAG;					!
 IV:IV ROM-ONE-TAG;					!
 V:V ROM-ONE-TAG;					!
 VI:VI ROM-ONE-TAG;					!
 VII:VII ROM-ONE-TAG;					!
 VIII:VIII ROM-ONE-TAG;					!
 IX:IX ROM-ONE-TAG;					!

LEXICON ROM-ONE-TAG					!^C^
 : ROMNUMTAG ;						!
! +N: ROMNUMTAG ;					!^C^ !The Olav viđeš fix (Roman V now gets A)
%-: ROM-SPLIT ;						!

! Here, we split the Roman numerals, in order to account for cases like "Kapihtal II-IV".
! We may send this first part directly to ROM-TAG below (and get the +Num tag), or we may
! send them through a second loop, identical to the first one, but marked wit "2" (the lexica
! are called 2ROMAN, etc. We do this instead of making a loop, since we do not want cases
! like "II-IV-VI-VII-IX". If that should turn out to be a good idea, a loop would do the 
! trick.

LEXICON ROM-SPLIT						!^C^
 :%- 2ROMAN ; ! II-VI, etc.				!


! Here goes loop 2.

LEXICON 2ROMAN							!^C^
 : 2ROM-THOUSAND ;						!
 : 2ROM-HUNDRED ;							!
 : 2ROM-TEN ;								!
 : 2ROM-ONE ;								!

LEXICON 2ROM-THOUSAND              		!^C^
 M:M 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG;					!
 MM:MM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG;					!
 MMM:MMM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG;				!
 MMMM:MMMM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG;				!
 MMMMM:MMMMM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG;				!

LEXICON 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG				!^C^
 : ROMNUMTAG ;							!
 : 2ROM-HUNDRED ;							!

LEXICON 2ROM-HUNDRED					!^C^
 C:C 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;					!
 CC:CC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;					!
 CCC:CCC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;					!
 CD:CD 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;					!
 D:D 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;					!
 DC:DC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;					!
 DCC:DCC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;					!
 DCCC:DCCC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;				!
 CM:CM 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG;					!

LEXICON 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG				!^C^
 : ROMNUMTAG ;							!
 : 2ROM-TEN ;								!

LEXICON 2ROM-TEN						!^C^
 X:X 2ROM-TEN-TAG;						!
 XX:XX 2ROM-TEN-TAG;						!
 XXX:XXX 2ROM-TEN-TAG;						!
 XL:XL 2ROM-TEN-TAG;						!
 L:L 2ROM-TEN-TAG;						!
 LX:LX 2ROM-TEN-TAG;						!
 LXX:LXX 2ROM-TEN-TAG;						!
 LXXX:LXXX 2ROM-TEN-TAG;					!
 XC:XC 2ROM-TEN-TAG;						!

LEXICON 2ROM-TEN-TAG					!^C^
 : ROMNUMTAG ;							!
 : 2ROM-ONE ;								!

LEXICON 2ROM-ONE						!^C^
 I:I 2ROM-ONE-TAG;						!
 II:II 2ROM-ONE-TAG;						!
 III:III 2ROM-ONE-TAG;						!
 IV:IV 2ROM-ONE-TAG;						!
 V:V 2ROM-ONE-TAG;						!
 VI:VI 2ROM-ONE-TAG;						!
 VII:VII 2ROM-ONE-TAG;						!
 VIII:VIII 2ROM-ONE-TAG;					!
 IX:IX 2ROM-ONE-TAG;						!

LEXICON 2ROM-ONE-TAG
 ROMNUMTAG ;
 
LEXICON ROMNUMTAG
 +Num+Rom+Sg+Nom: # ;
 +Num+Rom+Sg+Gen: # ;
!+Num+Acc: # ;
 +A+Rom+Ord+Sg:%. # ; !III. as ordinal.
 +A+Rom+Ord+Sg:   # ; !Looking for trouble...
 +Num:%: ROMNUMTAGOBL  ;
 +Num:%'  ROMNUMTAGOBL ;
 +Num:%- ROMNUMTAGOBL  ;
 +Num:%´ ROMNUMTAGOBL  ;
! +Num:   ROMNUMTAGOBL ;

LEXICON ROMNUMTAGOBL
 +Rom+Sg+Ill:%>hán        # ;
 +Rom+Sg+Ill:%>n        # ;
 +Rom+Sg+Com:%>jn       # ;


!LEXICON ARAB_DER ! only for arabics
! +Cmp-#nummeer:»»»-nummeers DER-SAS ;
! +Der+Der/ahasas:-ahas ANOLASJ  ;
! +Cmp-#:»»»- CMP_NAMAG ;
! +Cmp-#:»»»- CMP_IHASAS ;

LEXICON COORDINATES_1
!65˚36′8,30″
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] [˚] > COORDINATES_2 ;
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [˚] > COORDINATES_2 ;
< [9] [%0] [˚] > COORDINATES_END ;

LEXICON COORDINATES_2
 COORDINATES_END ; ! only degrees
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] [′] > COORDINATES_3 ;
< [1|2|3|4|5] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [′] > COORDINATES_3 ;
< [6] [%0] [′] > COORDINATES_END ;
LEXICON COORDINATES_3
 COORDINATES_END ; ! only minutes
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] > COORDINATES_4 ;
< [1|2|3|4|5] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > COORDINATES_4 ;
< [6] [%0] [″] > COORDINATES_END ;
LEXICON COORDINATES_4
″ COORDINATES_END ; ! only whole seconds
, COORDINATES_5 ;

LEXICON COORDINATES_5
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] [″] > COORDINATES_END ;
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [″] > COORDINATES_END ;
< [1] [%0] [%0] [″] > COORDINATES_END ;

LEXICON COORDINATES_END
+Num+Coord: # ;


 

! A final section with some isolated numeral expresssions !
! ------------------------------------------------------- !

      
LEXICON ISOLATED-NUMEXP					!^C^
 ½+Num:½ # ;						!
 ¹+Num:¹ # ;						!
 ²+Num:² # ;						!
 ³+Num:³ # ;						!
 ¼+Num:¼ # ;						!
